Illinois, session 104th, SB1290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Section 50-1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-1)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-1. This Act may be cited as the the Nurse Practice 9Act.10(Source: P.A. 95-639, eff. 10-5-07.)